Wyoming, session 2025, HB0046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-4-102(b) is amended to read:
21-4-102. When attendance required; exemptions;
withdrawal.
(b) A home-based educational program shall meet the
requirements of a basic academic educational program
pursuant to W.S. 21-4-101(a)(vi). It shall be the
responsibility of every person administering a home-based
educational program to submit ensure a curriculum to the
local board of trustees each year showing is administered
to pupils in the program that the program complies with the
requirements of this subsection. Failure to submit a
curriculum showing compliance is prima facie evidence that
the home-based educational program does not meet the
requirements of this article.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 28, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2